ru: Покрытие механики кларнета: Золотое; Никелевое; Серебряное; Без покрытия (необработанное); Другое
ko: 클라리넷 키워크 마감: 금도금; 니켈 도금; 은도금; 무도금(원자재); 기타
de: Klarinettenklappenbeschichtung: Vergoldet; Vernickelt; Versilbert; Unbeschichtet (roh); Sonstige
hr-HR: Obloga tipki klarineta: Pozlaćeno; Poniklano; Posrebreno; Bez presvlake (sirovo); Ostalo
ja: クラリネットキーワーク素材: 金メッキ; ニッケルメッキ; 銀メッキ; メッキなし (未加工); その他
sl-SI: Obloga tipk klarineta: Pozlačeno; Ponikljano; Posrebreno; Neprevlečeno (surovo); Drugo
en: Clarinet keywork plating: Gold-plated; Nickel-plated; Silver-plated; Unplated (raw); Other
pl: Pokrycie klawiszy klarnetu: Pozłacane; Poniklowane; Posrebrzane; Nieplaterowane (surowe); Inne
it: Placcatura della meccanica del clarinetto: Placcato oro; Nichelato; Placcato argento; Non placcato (grezzo); Altro
sv: Tangentlackering klarinett: Guldpläterad; Förnicklad; Försilvrad; Opläterad (rå); Annan
sk-SK: Pokovovanie klapiek klarinetu: Pozlátené; Poniklované; Postriebrené; Bez povrchovej úpravy (surové); Iné
hu: Klarinét billentyűzetének bevonata: Aranyozott; Nikkelezett; Ezüstözött; Bevonat nélküli (nyers); Egyéb
lt-LT: Klarneto klavišų apdaila: Paauksuotas; Nikeliuotas; Pasidabruotas; Nedengtas (natūralus); Kita
nl: Materiaalafwerking kleppenmechanisme klarinet: Verguld; Vernikkeld; Verzilverd; Onbehandeld (ruw); Anders
tr: Klarnet tuş kaplaması: Altın kaplama; Nikel kaplama; Gümüş kaplama; Kaplamasız (ham); Diğer
es: Baño de las llaves del clarinete: Chapado en oro; Niquelado; Plateado; Sin baño (en bruto); Otro
th: การชุบผิวกลไกคีย์ของคลาริเน็ต: ชุบทอง; ชุบนิกเกิล; ชุบเงิน; ไม่ได้ชุบ (ดิบ); อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Revestimento das chaves do clarinete: Banhado a ouro; Niquelado; Banhado a prata; Não banhado (bruto); Outro
ro-RO: Placarea mecanismului de clape al clarinetului: Placat cu aur; Placat cu nichel; Placat cu argint; Neplacat (brut); Altele
zh-CN: 单簧管按键镀层: 镀金; 镀镍; 镀银; 无镀层（原色）; 其他
fi: Klarinetin koskettimien pinnoitus: Kullattu; Nikkelöity; Hopeoitu; Pinnoittamaton (raaka); Muu
nb: Plater på knapper på klarinett: Gullbelagt; Nikkelbelagt; Sølvbelagt; Ubelagt (rå); Annet
zh-TW: 單簧管按鍵鍍層: 鍍金; 鍍鎳; 鍍銀; 無鍍層 (原材質); 其他
da: Belægning på klarinettens klaviatur: Guldbelagt; Forniklet; Forsølvet; Ubelagt (rå); Andet
pt-BR: Revestimento das chaves do clarinete: Banhado a ouro; Niquelado; Banhado a prata; Sem banho (bruto); Outro
cs: Pokovení klapek klarinetu: Pozlacené; Poniklované; Postříbřené; Bez pokovení (surové); Jiné
el: Επιμετάλλωση μηχανισμού κλειδιών κλαρινέτου: Επίχρυσο; Επινικελωμένο; Επάργυρο; Χωρίς επιμετάλλωση (ακατέργαστο); Άλλο
fr: Galvanisation des clés de clarinette: Plaqué or; Plaqué nickel; Plaqué argent; Non plaqué (brut); Autre
vi: Lớp mạ hệ thống phím kèn Clarinet: Mạ vàng; Mạ ni-ken; Mạ bạc; Không mạ (thô); Khác
bg-BG: Покритие на клавишите на кларинета: Със златно покритие; С никелово покритие; Със сребърно покритие; Без покритие (суров); Друго